Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB899.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Workplaces Act.Section 2. Scope of act.This act relates to promoting healthy families, employees and workplaces by establishing an earned paid sick time policy in this Commonwealth in order to:(1) Ensure that all workers in this Commonwealth can address their own health and safety needs and the health and safety needs of their families by requiring employers to provide a minimum level of earned paid sick time, including time to care for their family members.(2) Diminish public and private health care costs and promote preventive health services in this Commonwealth by enabling workers to seek early and routine medical care for themselves and their family members.(3) Protect the public's health in this Commonwealth by reducing the risk of contagion.(4) Promote the economic security and stability of workers and their families.(5) Protect employees in this Commonwealth from losing their jobs or facing workplace discipline when they use the paid sick time they earn to care for themselves or their families.20250HB0899PN0941 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Assist victims of domestic violence and their family members by providing them job-protected time away from work to receive treatment and take the necessary steps to ensure their safety.(7) Safeguard the public welfare, health, safety and prosperity of the residents of this Commonwealth.(8) Accomplish the purposes described in this section in a manner that is feasible for employers.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Earned paid sick time." Time that an employee is compensated for at the same hourly rate and with the same benefits, including health care benefits, as the employee normally earns during hours worked and is provided by the employer to the employee for the purposes described in section 5."Employee." An individual who works part time or full time for an employer or who is under the direction of an employer or a subcontractor of an employer for wages, salary or remuneration of any type under contract or subcontract of employment. The term does not include an individual who is subject to the provisions of 45 U.S.C. Ch. 11 (relating to railroad unemployment insurance)."Employer." A person, including an agent of a person, that engages the services of an employee for wages, salary or remuneration of any type under contract or subcontract of 20250HB0899PN0941 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment. The term does not include the Federal Government."Family member." Any of the following with respect to an employee:(1) Regardless of age, a biological, adopted or foster child, stepchild or legal ward, a child of a domestic partner, a child to whom the employee stands in loco parentis or an individual to whom the employee stood in loco parentis when the individual was a minor.(2) A biological, foster, stepparent or adoptive parent or legal guardian of the employee or the employee's spouse or domestic partner or an individual who stood in loco parentis when the employee or employee's spouse or domestic partner was a minor child.(3) An individual to whom the employee is legally married under the laws of a state or a domestic partner of an employee as registered under the laws of a state or political subdivision.(4) A grandparent, grandchild or sibling, whether of a biological, foster, adoptive or step relationship, of the employee or the employee's spouse or domestic partner.(5) Any other individual related by blood.(6) Any other individual whose close association with the employee is the equivalent of a family relationship."Health care provider." An individual licensed under Federal or State law to provide medical or emergency services, including a doctor, nurse, certified nurse midwife and emergency room personnel."Minimum Wage Act." The act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or 20250HB0899PN0941 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 township. The term includes a municipality operating under 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. III Subpt. E (relating to home rule and optional plan government)."Retaliatory personnel action." Any of the following:(1) A denial of a right guaranteed under this act.(2) A threat, discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction of hours, reporting or threatening to report an employee's suspected citizenship or immigration status or the suspected citizenship or immigration status of a family member of the employee to a Federal, State or local agency.(3) Any other adverse action against an employee for the exercise of a right guaranteed under this act, including a sanction against an employee who is the recipient of public benefits for rights guaranteed under this act.(4) Interference with or punishment for in any manner participating in or assisting an investigation, proceeding or hearing under this act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Year." As follows:(1) A regular and consecutive 12-month period as determined by an employer and communicated to its employees.(2) For the purposes of sections 8 and 14, the term means a calendar year.Section 4. Accrual of earned paid sick time.(a) General rule.--An employee shall accrue a minimum of one hour of earned paid sick time for every 30 hours worked, beginning at the commencement of employment or on the date this act goes into effect, whichever is later.(b) Exemption.--An employee who is exempt from overtime 20250HB0899PN0941 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of section 5 of the Minimum Wage Act as an administrative, executive or professional employee shall be deemed to work 40 hours per workweek for purposes of this act unless the employee's normal workweek is less than 40 hours, in which case the employee shall accrue earned paid sick time based upon that normal workweek.(c) Limit.--An employer may limit an employee's use of earned paid sick time to 80 hours in each year.(d) Carry over.--(1) An employer shall carry over earned paid sick time to the following year.(2) In lieu of carryover of unused earned paid sick time from one year to the next under paragraph (1), an employer may pay an employee for unused earned paid sick time at the end of a year and provide the employee with an amount of paid sick time that meets or exceeds the requirements of this act that is available for the employee's immediate use at the beginning of the subsequent year.(e) Distribution of leave.--An employer may:(1) Provide the full amount of earned paid sick time an employee is expected to earn in the year to the employee at the beginning of the year.(2) Lend earned paid sick time to an employee in advance of accrual, documenting that loan.(f) Additional time not required.--(1) An employer is not required to provide additional paid sick time if the employer provides a paid leave policy or paid time off policy that makes an amount of leave available that is sufficient to meet the accrual, carryover and use requirements of this act.20250HB0899PN0941 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The leave or time off provided under the employer's paid leave policy or paid time off policy may be used to satisfy the earned paid sick time requirements of this act.(3) When used to satisfy the requirements of this act, the leave shall be used for the same purposes, under the same conditions, and with the same protections as earned paid sick time under this act.Section 5. Use of earned paid sick time.(a) Requirement.--An employer shall provide earned paid sick time to an employee for:(1) The employee's:(i) mental or physical illness, injury or health condition;(ii) need for medical diagnosis, care or treatment of a mental or physical illness, injury or health condition; or(iii) need for preventive medical care.(2) Care of a family member:(i) with a mental or physical illness, injury or health condition;(ii) who needs medical diagnosis, care or treatment of a mental or physical illness, injury or health condition;(iii) who needs preventive medical care; or(iv) where, in the case of a child, the employee must attend a school meeting or a meeting at a place where the child receives care necessitated by the child's health condition or disability or emotional difficulties caused by an act of abuse or sexual violence as defined in paragraph (7).20250HB0899PN0941 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Closure of the employee's place of business by order of a public official due to a public health emergency.(4) The employee's need to care for a child whose school or place of care has been closed by order of a public official due to a public health emergency.(5) The employee's need to care for oneself or a family member when it has been determined by a health authority having jurisdiction, a health care provider or the employer of the employee or employee's family member, that the employee's or family member's presence in the community may jeopardize the health of others because of the employee's or family member's exposure to a communicable disease, whether or not the employee or family member has actually contracted the communicable disease.(6) The employee's inability to work or telework because the employee is:(i) prohibited from working by the employer due to health concerns related to the potential transmission of a communicable illness related to the public health emergency; or(ii) seeking or awaiting the results of a diagnostic test for, or a medical diagnosis of, the communicable illness related to a public emergency and the employee has been exposed to the communicable illness or the employee's employer has requested the test or diagnosis.(7) Absence necessary due to an act of abuse as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a) (relating to definitions), sexual violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 62A03 (relating to definitions) or an act of domestic and other violence as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3 (relating to definitions), if 20250HB0899PN0941 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the leave is for the purpose of allowing the employee to obtain for the employee or the employee's family member:(i) Diagnosis, treatment, care or other assistance for a physical, mental or emotional injury or other medical attention needed to recover from a physical or psychological injury or disability caused by abuse or sexual violence.(ii) Services from a victim services organization.(iii) Psychological or other counseling.(iv) Relocation or taking steps to secure an existing home due to the abuse or sexual violence.(v) Legal services, including preparing for or participating in a civil or criminal legal proceeding, related to or resulting from the abuse or sexual violence.(b) Request for time.--An employer shall provide, at the request of an employee, earned paid sick time. The request may be made orally, in writing, by electronic means or by any other means acceptable to the employer. When possible, the request shall include the expected duration of the absence.(c) Good faith effort by employee.--(1) If the use of earned paid sick time is foreseeable, the employee shall make:(i) a good faith effort to provide notice of the need for time to the employer in advance of the use of the earned paid sick time; and(ii) a reasonable effort to schedule the use of earned paid sick time in a manner that does not unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.(2) If the use of earned paid sick time is not 20250HB0899PN0941 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 foreseeable, the employee shall provide written or verbal notice of the need for the leave to the employer as soon as practicable.(d) Policy.--An employer that requires specific notice of the use of earned paid sick time shall provide a written policy that contains procedures for the employee to provide notice. An employer that has not provided to the employee a copy of its written policy for providing specific notice may not deny earned paid sick time to the employee based on noncompliance with the policy.(e) Coverage.--An employer may not require, as a condition of an employee's taking earned paid sick time, that the employee search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours or days during which the employee uses earned paid sick time.(f) Increments.--Earned paid sick time may be used in the smaller of hourly increments or the smallest increment that the employer's payroll system uses to account for absences or use of other time.(g) Documentation.--(1) For earned paid sick time of three or more consecutive work days, an employer may require reasonable documentation that the earned paid sick time has been used for a purpose covered by this subsection.(2) Documentation signed by a heath care professional indicating that earned paid sick time is necessary shall be considered reasonable documentation for purposes of this section.(3) In a case of abuse or sexual violence any of the following types of documentation shall be considered reasonable documentation:20250HB0899PN0941 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A police report indicating that the employee or the employee's family member was a victim of abuse or sexual violence.(ii) A signed statement from a victim and witness advocate affirming that the employee or employee's family member is receiving services from a victim services organization.(iii) A court document indicating that the employee or employee's family member is involved in legal action related to abuse or sexual violence.(iv) An employer may not require that the documentation explain the nature of the illness or the details of the violence.(h) Cost of documentation.--(1) If an employer chooses to require documentation for earned paid sick time and the employer does not offer health insurance to an employee, the employer shall pay all out-of-pocket expenses the employee incurs in obtaining the documentation.(2) If an employee has health insurance, the employer shall pay costs charged to the employee by the health care provider for providing the specific documentation required by the employer.(3) An employer shall pay costs charged to an employee for documentation of abuse or sexual violence required by the employer.Section 6. Payment of earned sick time.(a) Calculation.--(1) Earned paid sick time may not be compensated at an hourly amount less than that provided under 29 U.S.C. § 20250HB0899PN0941 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 206(a)(1) (relating to minimum wage), The Minimum Wage Act or a higher amount if a higher amount is enacted for employees in this Commonwealth, whichever is greater.(2) If an employee, in the 90 days of employment before using accrued sick leave, had different hourly pay rates, was paid by commission or piece rate or was a nonexempt salaried employee, the rate of pay shall be calculated by dividing the employee's total wages, not including overtime premium pay, by the total number of hours worked in the full pay periods of the prior 90 days of employment.(b) Payment.--An employer shall provide payment for earned paid sick time used by an employee no later than the payday for the next regular payroll period after the earned paid sick time was used.(c) Reimbursement.--Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring financial or other reimbursement to an employee from an employer upon the employee's termination, resignation, retirement or other separation from employment for accrued earned paid sick time that has not been used unless otherwise required by law or collective bargaining agreement.(d) Transfer.--If an employee is transferred to a separate division, entity or location, but remains employed by the same employer, the employee is entitled to:(1) all earned paid sick time accrued at the prior division, entity or location; and(2) use all earned paid sick time as provided in this section.(e) Separation.--(1) If there is a separation from employment and the employee is rehired within 12 months of separation by the 20250HB0899PN0941 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 same employer, the employer shall reinstate previously accrued earned paid sick time that had not been used.(2) The employee shall be entitled to use accrued earned paid sick time and accrue additional earned paid sick time at the recommencement of employment.(f) Succession or takeover.--If a different employer succeeds or takes the place of an existing employer, all employees of the original employer who remain employed by the successor employer are entitled to:(1) all earned paid sick time accrued when employed by the original employer; and(2) use earned paid sick time previously accrued.Section 7. Notice and posting.(a) Duty of employer.--(1) An employer shall give an employee written notice of the following at the commencement of employment:(i) Entitlement to earned paid sick time and the amount of earned paid sick time.(ii) The terms of use of earned paid sick time guaranteed under this act.(iii) Retaliatory personnel action against an employee who requests or uses earned paid sick time is prohibited by law.(iv) The right to file a complaint or bring a civil action if earned paid sick time as required by this act is denied by the employer or the employee is subjected to retaliatory personnel action for requesting or taking earned paid sick time.(v) The contact information for the department where questions about rights and responsibilities under this 20250HB0899PN0941 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act can be answered.(2) The department may impose penalties on an employer that fails to provide notice in accordance with this subsection.(b) Display.--An employer shall display a poster, developed by the department, in a conspicuous place within each workplace of the employer, that states all of the following:(1) An employee is entitled to accrue, request and use earned paid sick time provided under this act.(2) The amount of earned paid sick time provided under this act.(3) The terms of use of earned paid sick time.(4) Retaliatory personnel actions or discrimination against an employee who requests earned paid sick time or uses earned paid sick time, or both, is prohibited and that an employee has the right under law to file a complaint with the department against an employer that retaliates or discriminates against the employee.(c) Information on paycheck.--The amount of earned paid sick time available to an employee, the amount of earned paid sick time taken by an employee to date in the year and the amount of pay an employee has received as earned paid sick time, shall be recorded in, or on an attachment to, the employee's regular paycheck.Section 8. Employer records.(a) Duty of employer.--An employer shall retain records documenting hours worked by an employee and earned paid sick time taken by an employee for a period of three years, and shall allow the department access to the records, with appropriate notice and at a mutually agreeable time, to monitor compliance 20250HB0899PN0941 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the requirements of this act.(b) Presumption.--If an issue arises as to an employee's entitlement to earned paid sick time under this section and the employer has not maintained or retained adequate records documenting hours worked by the employee and earned paid sick time taken by the employee, or does not allow the department reasonable access to the records, it shall be presumed that the employer has violated this act, absent clear and convincing evidence otherwise.Section 9. Regulations.The department may issue guidelines and promulgate regulations to administer and enforce this act.Section 10. Confidentiality and nondisclosure.(a) Prohibition.--An employer may not require disclosure of details relating to abuse or sexual violence or the details of an employee's or an employee's family member's health information as a condition of providing earned paid sick time under this act.(b) Duty of employer.--If an employer possesses health information or information pertaining to abuse or sexual violence about an employee or employee's family member, the employer shall treat the information as confidential and may not disclose the information, except to the affected employee or with the permission of the affected employee.Section 11. Other legal requirements.This act provides minimum requirements pertaining to earned paid sick time and shall not be construed to preempt, limit or otherwise affect the applicability of any other law, regulation, requirement, policy or standard that:(1) provides greater accrual or use by an employee of 20250HB0899PN0941 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 earned paid sick time; or(2) extends other protections to an employee.Section 12. Exercise of rights protected and retaliation prohibited.The following apply to the exercise of rights:(1) An employer or other person may not interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of or the attempt to exercise a right protected under this act.(2) An employer may not take retaliatory personnel action or discriminate against an employee or former employee because the individual has exercised a right protected under this act, including:(i) The right to request or use earned paid sick time as provided under this act.(ii) The right to file a complaint with the department or court or inform an individual about an employer's alleged violation of this act.(iii) The right to participate in an investigation, hearing or proceeding or cooperate with or assist the department in the department's investigation of an alleged violation of this act.(iv) The right to inform an individual of the individual's rights under this act.(3) An employer may not establish or enforce an absence control policy to count earned paid sick time taken under this act as an absence that leads to or results in discipline, discharge, demotion, suspension or other adverse action against an employee.(4) This section shall apply to an individual who, in good faith, alleges a violation of this act.20250HB0899PN0941 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) There shall be a rebuttable presumption of unlawful retaliatory personnel action under this section if an employer takes adverse action against an individual within 90 days of when the individual:(i) files a complaint with the department or a court alleging a violation of this act;(ii) informs a person about the employer's alleged violation of this act;(iii) cooperates with the department or a person in the investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this act;(iv) opposes a policy, practice or act that is unlawful under this act; or(v) informs another individual of the other individual's rights under this act.Section 13. Complaint procedure.An employee may file on a form prescribed by the department a complaint against the employer for an alleged violation of this act. The department shall establish a process by regulation for investigating and resolving a complaint.Section 14. Enforcement.(a) Violation.--An employer who willfully violates the notice and posting provisions of section 7 shall be subject to a penalty, not to exceed $250 for each offense, to be imposed by the department.(b) Department order.--The department may order an employer who is found to be in violation of this act to do any of the following with respect to an employee:(1) Reinstate the employee with back pay.(2) Pay the employee the amount of sick leave unlawfully 20250HB0899PN0941 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 withheld.(3) Pay the employee an additional sum in the form of an administrative penalty as follows:(i) If earned paid sick time was unlawfully withheld, the administrative penalty shall be an amount equal to the dollar amount of earned paid sick time unlawfully withheld multiplied by three, or $250, whichever is greater, not to exceed $5,000.(ii) If the violation of this act resulted in additional harm to the employee, such as discharge from employment, or otherwise results in a violation of the rights of the employee, the administrative penalty shall include an additional sum of $500 for each day or portion of a day that the violation occurred or continued, not to exceed $10,000.(c) Civil action.--The secretary, the Attorney General or an employee may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the employer or a person violating this act and, upon prevailing and except as provided under subsection (d) or (e), shall be entitled to collect legal or equitable relief on behalf of the aggrieved as may be appropriate to remedy the violation, including:(1) Reinstatement of the employee with back pay.(2) Payment of earned paid sick time unlawfully withheld.(3) The payment of:(i) An additional sum, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of $5,000, as liquidated damages in the amount of $50 to each employee or individual whose rights under this act were violated for each day or portion of a day 20250HB0899PN0941 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that the violation occurred or continued.(ii) If the employer unlawfully withheld earned paid sick time to the employee, the dollar amount of paid sick days withheld from the employee multiplied by three or $250, whichever amount is greater.(4) Injunctive relief.(5) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.(d) Limitation on damages.--The secretary, the Attorney General or an employee enforcing this act on behalf of the public shall, upon prevailing, be entitled only to equitable, injunctive or restitutionary relief and reasonable attorney fees and costs.(e) Error.--(1) An employer may not be assessed a penalty or liquidated damages under this section due to an isolated and unintentional payroll error or written notice error that is a clerical or an inadvertent mistake regarding the accrual or available use of earned paid sick time.(2) In a review under this subsection, consideration may be given to whether the employer, prior to an alleged violation, has adopted and is in compliance with a set of policies, procedures and practices that fully comply with this act.(f) Interest.--In an administrative or civil action brought under this section, the secretary or a court shall award interest on each amount due and unpaid calculated in accordance with law.(g) Penalties cumulative.--The remedies, penalties and procedures provided under this section shall be cumulative.(h) Applicability.--This section shall only apply within two 20250HB0899PN0941 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years from the date that an employee became aware of an alleged violation of this act.Section 15. Construction.This act:(1) May not be construed to invalidate an ordinance or other mandate enacted by a municipality prior to the effective date of this paragraph that requires employers within the municipality to provide paid sick leave benefits more generous than those contained under this act.(2) May not be construed to prohibit a municipality from enacting an ordinance or mandate that requires employers within the municipality to provide paid sick leave benefits more generous than those contained under this act.(3) May not be construed to discourage or prohibit an employer from the adoption or retention of an earned paid sick time policy more generous than that contained in this act or an ordinance adopted by a municipality under paragraph (1) or (2).(4) May not preempt or otherwise apply to an ordinance or mandate enacted by a municipality affecting vacation, public health emergency leave or other form of leave offered by an employer within the municipality.(5) May not be construed to mandate a municipality to adopt an ordinance applicable to an employer within the municipality relating to compensation, vacation or other forms of leave from employment.(6) May not limit or affect any Federal, State or local law guaranteeing privacy of health information or information related to domestic violence or sexual assault regarding an employee or employee's family member.20250HB0899PN0941 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) May not relieve or lessen the obligation of an employer to comply with a contract, collective bargaining agreement, employment benefit plan or other agreement in effect on the effective date of this paragraph that provides more paid sick leave to an employee than that required by this act or an ordinance adopted by a municipality under paragraph (1) or (2).(8) May not be construed to remove the contents of this act from the scope of collective bargaining under:(i) the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act;(ii) the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949;(iii) the act of June 24, 1968 (P.L.237, No.111), referred to as the Policemen and Firemen Collective Bargaining Act; or(iv) the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.(9) May not preempt, limit or affect the applicability of any other law, regulation, requirement, policy or standard providing for equal or greater accrual or use of paid or unpaid earned sick time or that extends other protections to an employee.(10) May not supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to school employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law, including the Public Employe Relations Act.(11) Shall be in addition to and independent of any other right, remedy or procedure available under any other law and shall not be construed to diminish, alter or negate 20250HB0899PN0941 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any other legal right, remedy or procedure available to an aggrieved individual.Section 16. Public education and outreach.The department shall develop and implement a multilingual outreach program to inform employees, parents and individuals who are under the care of a health care provider about the availability of earned paid sick time under this act. The department shall distribute notices and other written materials about the program in English and any language that is the first language spoken by at least 5% of this Commonwealth's population to all child-care and elder-care providers, domestic violence shelters, schools, hospitals, community health centers and other health care providers.Section 17. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0899PN0941 - 22 - 123456789101112131415